District of Columbia statutes.
42-3401.04

Applicability of Rental Housing Act of 1985.

For purposes of this chapter, the provisions of § 42-3505.01(n) shall apply.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 104
as added Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 302, 48 DCR 1888
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 30, 49 DCR 8140

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-213 validated a previously made technical correction.

Editor's Notes

Section 601 of D.C. Law 13-281 provided: “The Mayor may issue rules to implement the Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Properties Omnibus Amendment Act of 2000 in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.”